Hawaii statutes.
§431:10A-116 Coverage for specific
services. Every person insured under a policy of accident and health or
sickness insurance delivered or issued for delivery in this State shall be
entitled to the reimbursements and coverages specified below:

(1) Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary,
whenever a policy, contract, plan, or agreement provides for reimbursement for
any visual or optometric service, which is within the lawful scope of practice
of a duly licensed optometrist, the person entitled to benefits or the person
performing the services shall be entitled to reimbursement whether the service
is performed by a licensed physician or by a licensed optometrist. Visual or
optometric services shall include eye or visual examination, or both, or a correction
of any visual or muscular anomaly, and the supplying of ophthalmic materials,
lenses, contact lenses, spectacles, eyeglasses, and appurtenances thereto;

(2) Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary,
for all policies, contracts, plans, or agreements issued on or after May 30,
1974, whenever provision is made for reimbursement or indemnity for any service
related to surgical or emergency procedures, which is within the lawful scope
of practice of any practitioner licensed to practice medicine in this State,
reimbursement or indemnification under the policy, contract, plan, or agreement
shall not be denied when the services are performed by a dentist acting within
the lawful scope of the dentist's license;

(3) Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary,
whenever the policy provides reimbursement or payment for any service, which is
within the lawful scope of practice of a psychologist licensed in this State,
the person entitled to benefits or performing the service shall be entitled to
reimbursement or payment, whether the service is performed by a licensed
physician or licensed psychologist;

(4) Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary,
each policy, contract, plan, or agreement issued on or after February 1, 1991,
except for policies that only provide coverage for specified diseases or other
limited benefit coverage, but including policies issued by companies subject to
chapter 431, article 10A, part II and chapter 432, article 1 shall provide
coverage for screening by low-dose mammography for occult breast cancer as
follows:

(A) For women forty years of age and older,
an annual mammogram; and

(B) For a woman of any age with a history of
breast cancer or whose mother or sister has had a history of breast cancer, a
mammogram upon the recommendation of the woman's physician.

The services provided in this paragraph are
subject to any coinsurance provisions that may be in force in these policies,
contracts, plans, or agreements.

For the purpose of this paragraph, the term
"low-dose mammography" means the x-ray examination of the breast
using equipment dedicated specifically for mammography, including but not
limited to the x-ray tube, filter, compression device, screens, films, and
cassettes, with an average radiation exposure delivery of less than one rad
mid-breast, with two views for each breast. An insurer may provide the
services required by this paragraph through contracts with providers; provided
that the contract is determined to be a cost-effective means of delivering the
services without sacrifice of quality and meets the approval of the director of
health;

(5) (A) (i) Notwithstanding any provision to the
contrary, whenever a policy, contract, plan, or agreement provides coverage for
the children of the insured, that coverage shall also extend to the date of
birth of any newborn child to be adopted by the insured; provided that the
insured gives written notice to the insurer of the insured's intent to adopt
the child prior to the child's date of birth or within thirty days after the
child's birth or within the time period required for enrollment of a natural
born child under the policy, contract, plan, or agreement of the insured,
whichever period is longer; provided further that if the adoption proceedings
are not successful, the insured shall reimburse the insurer for any expenses
paid for the child; and

(ii) Where notification has not been received
by the insurer prior to the child's birth or within the specified period
following the child's birth, insurance coverage shall be effective from the
first day following the insurer's receipt of legal notification of the
insured's ability to consent for treatment of the infant for whom coverage is
sought; and

(B) When the insured is a member of a health
maintenance organization (HMO), coverage of an adopted newborn is effective:

(i) From the date of birth of the adopted
newborn when the newborn is treated from birth pursuant to a provider contract
with the health maintenance organization, and written notice of enrollment in accord
with the health maintenance organization's usual enrollment process is provided
within thirty days of the date the insured notifies the health maintenance
organization of the insured's intent to adopt the infant for whom coverage is
sought; or

(ii) From the first day following receipt by
the health maintenance organization of written notice of the insured's ability
to consent for treatment of the infant for whom coverage is sought and
enrollment of the adopted newborn in accord with the health maintenance
organization's usual enrollment process if the newborn has been treated from
birth by a provider not contracting or affiliated with the health maintenance
organization; and

(6) Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary,
any policy, contract, plan, or agreement issued or renewed in this State shall
provide reimbursement for services provided by advanced practice registered
nurses licensed pursuant to chapter 457. Services rendered by advanced
practice registered nurses are subject to the same policy limitations generally
applicable to health care providers within the policy, contract, plan, or
agreement. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 1990, c 112, §2; am L 1991, c 268,
§§1, 5; am L 1994, c 279, §3; am L 1995, c 47, §1; am L 1999, c 13, §2 and c 222,
§3; am L 2002, c 155, §55; am L 2015, c 35, §45]

Note

Director of health to monitor mammogram screening services to
assure that the demand for screening does not exceed the ability of the medical
community to safely provide the services. L 1990, c 112, §5.

Cross References

Sunset evaluations modified, see §§26H-4, 5.

Civil relief for state military forces, see chapter 657D.

Federally funded programs, see §431:10A-602.

Newborn adopted children, see §432:1-602.6.

Risk-based capital for insurers, see §§431:3-401 to 414.

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next